California statutes. Education Code
(d) This section may be implemented using federal grant funds received pursuant to the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act of 2009 (Public Law 111-5) through that act’s provision of funds for statewide data systems under the federal Education Technical Assistance Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 9601 et seq.).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 159, Sec. 4.   (SB 19)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10805.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, the state board, and the department shall provide to the State Chief Information Officer the individual nonpersonally identifiable or aggregate data related to teacher distribution, educator credential status, pupil assessment and accountability, or other pupil academic and achievement data, including, but not limited to, data generated from, or related to, the California Assessment of Student Performance and Progress, the English language development test, the Academic Performance Index (API), and adequate yearly progress data and calculations, graduation rates, pupils who dropout of school, and demographics of pupils and
 teachers.

(b) The data provided pursuant to the section shall be provided as follows:

(1) In a format that is agreeable to all relevant parties.

(2) In a timely manner, according to a schedule agreed upon by all relevant parties.

(3) At no cost to the State Chief Information Officer.

(c) The State Chief Information Officer may release the information provided pursuant to subdivision (a) in any of the following manners:

(1) On paper at a single location that is accessible to the public.

(2) Electronically at a single location that is accessible to the public.

(3) Electronically via the Internet.

(d) The State Chief Information Officer shall ensure that the use of this data is in compliance with applicable state and federal privacy laws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 641, Sec. 4.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

10806.

In meeting the requirements of this chapter, state agencies, local educational agencies, and the officers and appointees of those agencies shall consider and comply with state and federal privacy law and ensure the highest, appropriate security protections are in place in order to provide the maximum protection of privacy.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 561, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

10807.

The department, the University of California, the California State University, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, the Employment Development Department, and the California School Information Services established in Section 49081 may enter into interagency agreements in order to facilitate all of the following:

(a) The implementation of a comprehensive longitudinal education data system for California.

(b) The transfer of data from one educational segment to another.

(c) The transfer of workforce data to the educational
 segments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, 5th Ex. Sess., Ch. 2, Sec. 4.   (SB 1 5x)   Effective April 12, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8.5. California Cradle-to-Career Data System Act [10850. - 10875.]



  ARTICLE 1. Cradle-to-Career Data System Workgroup [10850. - 10851.]

10850.

This chapter shall be known, and may be cited, as the California Cradle-to-Career Data System Act.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   (AB 2723)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10851.

The California Cradle-to-Career Data System Workgroup created pursuant to former Section 10853, as it read on January 1, 2024, is hereby dissolved.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 2024, Ch. 736, Sec. 2.   (AB 2723)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. California Cradle-to-Career Data System [10860. - 10875.]

10860.

(a) There is hereby established in state government the California Cradle-to-Career Data System for the purpose of connecting individuals and organizations to trusted information and resources. The data system shall be considered a source for actionable data and research on education, economic, and health outcomes for individuals, families, and communities, and provide for expanded access to tools and services that support the navigation of the education-to-employment pipeline.

(b) (1) The data system shall be used to provide access to data and information necessary to provide insights into critical milestones in the education-to-employment pipeline, including insight regarding early learning and care to grade 12, inclusive, and into higher
 education, skills training opportunities, and employment to better enable individuals to maximize their educational and career opportunities, and to foster evidence-based decisionmaking to help the state build a more equitable future.

(2) The information contained in the data system shall be used to accomplish all of the following:

(A) Address disparities in opportunities and outcomes.

(B) Support student guidance.

(C) Foster continuous improvement.

(D) Address the needs of researchers.

(c) The data system shall do all of the following:

(1) Enable the linkage,
 management, and monitoring of information on student progress through education, workforce training, employment, health, and social services.

(2) Ensure that information contained, and available through, the data system is kept secure and that individual privacy is protected.

(3) Provide for access to actionable data on education, economic, and health outcomes for use by individuals, students, families, and communities to, among other things, illustrate inequities in opportunities and outcomes.

(4) Provide support for professional development opportunities to further policy making and to improve the functionality of the system by end users, including state agencies, schools, colleges and universities, social service providers, and students and families.

(5) Provide support for opportunities to enhance the state’s system of public education, educational programs, and educational services.

(6) Advance academic, nonprofit, and governmental research to enhance the development of policies focused on birth through career.

(7) Support the creation of user-facing tools and services, and access to information necessary to do all of the following:

(A) Provide tailored supports to students, educators, parents, and advisors, and better enable students to navigate the education-to-employment pipeline.

(B) Enable the streamlining and administration of college application processes and student financial aid programs.

(C) Allow researchers
 and policymakers to explore policy problems and solutions.

(d) At all times, the data system shall act in furtherance of the public good and shall be held accountable thereto.

(e) The planning of the data system shall be subject to the Project Approval Lifecycle of the Department of Technology, pursuant to Section 4819.35 of the State Administrative Manual and all other relevant sections. The development and implementation of the data system shall be subject to the reporting and oversight requirements of the Department of Technology, pursuant to Section 4819.36 of the State Administrative Manual and all other relevant sections. The planning, development, and implementation of any additions to, or revisions of, the data system shall also be subject to these requirements.

(f) At all times, the data system shall comply
 with federal and state laws to protect individual privacy, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) The federal Family Education Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-280, as amended).

(2) The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, as amended).

(3) The federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-329, as amended).

(4) The federal Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-579, as amended).

(g) Any data maintained under this article that meets the definition of personal information, as defined in Section 1798.3 of the Civil Code, shall not be used or disclosed except for purposes consistent with this
 article. Whether or not it is protected under applicable federal or state law, personal information managed under this article shall be deidentified before being released to the public.

(h) (1) All of the following rights in the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) do not apply to records or source data from the P20W data set that are maintained under this article:

(A) The individual right to inquire and be notified as to whether the data system maintains a record about that individual, as provided in Section 1798.32 of the Civil Code.

(B) The individual right to inspect personal information in any record maintained in the data system, as provided in Section 1798.34 of the Civil Code.

(C) The individual right to request to amend any record maintained in the data system, as provided in Section 1798.35 of the Civil Code.

(2) In the event of a “security incident,” as defined in the participation agreement, the managing entity shall comply with the requirements of Section 1798.29 of the Civil Code.

(3) This subdivision does not affect an individual’s right to request to amend a record maintained by a data provider of record. To assist individuals who wish to exercise such rights, as applicable, the managing entity shall include on its internet website, a link to the contact information of a data provider’s privacy officer and, when applicable, a link to the relevant privacy web form maintained by the data provider.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 736, Sec. 3.   (AB 2723)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10861.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Advisory boards” means the advisory boards established pursuant to Section 10865.

(b) “A–G coursework” means the 15-unit pattern of courses across seven subject areas that pupils must complete during high school to meet minimum eligibility requirements for admission to the California State University or the University of California.

(c) “Analytical tools” means the resources that provide for access to information for research and evaluation purposes such as dashboards, a query builder, summaries of key student and employment outcomes, and a research library, including, but not limited to, the
 P20W data set.

(d) “California College Guidance Initiative” (CCGI) means the public-nonprofit partnership of Student Friendly Services, established pursuant to Item 6100-172-0001 of the annual Budget Act, authorized by Section 60900.5, and administered by the Foundation for California Community Colleges established pursuant to Section 72670.5, or a successor agent.

(e) “Data providers” means entities that submit the individual, educational, academic, training, employment, social service, health, and other information used to create the data system.

(f) “Data requests in the public interest” means those requests that enable parents, educators, health and human services providers, researchers, and policymakers to provide appropriate interventions and supports to address disparities in opportunities and improve outcomes
 for all students.

(g) “Data system” means the Cradle-to-Career Data System established pursuant to this chapter.

(h) “eTranscript California” means an electronic transcript service administered by the California Community Colleges, or a successor agent.

(i) “Governing board” means the governing board established pursuant to Section 10864 that is subject to Sections 10865 and 10866.

(j) “Managing entity” means the office created in Section 10862 that is responsible for Section 10867.

(k) “Operational tools” means the publicly supported educator-, student-, and parent-facing tools that use student-specific data to support college planning and education transitions, including, but not limited
 to, the CCGI and eTranscript California. All tools under this definition shall comply with the student privacy provisions of Section 49073.1. Pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10870, a local educational agency shall not be required to enter into a contract with a provider of publicly supported “operational tools” as defined in this subdivision.

(l) “Participation agreement” means the legal framework used by the state to establish the conditions under which data may be shared and used, and may include the use of a master data exchange agreement or other agreements between partner entities, data providers, and the managing entity.

(m) “P20W data set” means the data set adopted by the governing board and requested from the data providers, including, but not limited to, the data points described in the report to the Department of Finance and the Legislature required by
 subdivision (a) of former Section 10856, as it read on January 1, 2024, and as adjusted by the governing board. The governing board may add or remove requested data points based on changes in the usage of the element. As required by the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code) and the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1232g), data providers shall retain sole control over their source data and may reject, add, or remove data elements contributed to the P20W data set, as reflected in its participation agreement with the managing entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 736, Sec. 4.   (AB 2723)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10862.

(a) The Office of Cradle-to-Career Data is hereby created within the Government Operations Agency.

(b) The office shall also be known as the “managing entity,” and shall serve as a neutral administrative body, consistent with the purpose and intent of this chapter, to do all of the following:

(1) Initiate the data system during the startup process.

(2) Ensure wide, appropriate, and legal use of the data system as a one-stop shop for cradle-to-career data to support policy researchers. In order to ensure individual privacy, and in accordance with federal law, control of the data available through the data system
 shall be retained by the data providers who contributed the data through their participation agreement, and disclosed to and by the managing entity only to the extent permitted by federal law.

(3) Scale operational tools to better serve educators, students, and families.

(4) Implement communications, professional development, and technical assistance that supports data system use.

(c) (1) The managing entity shall operate until July 1, 2026, or a later date, as approved by the governing board, contingent on a review of the appropriateness and efficacy of the Government Operations Agency continuing to house the managing entity after July 1, 2026.

(2) A recommendation to move the managing entity under the administration of another
 state department or agency shall be submitted by the governing board to the Legislature and the Governor through the governing board’s annual budget submission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 8.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10863.

In fulfilling their roles, all governing board members, advisory board members, and managing entity employees shall do all of the following:

(a) Prioritize the needs of students and families.

(b) Comply with federal and state laws to protect individual privacy, including, but not necessarily limited to, all of the following:

(1) The federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-280, as amended).

(2) The federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191, as amended).

(3) The federal Higher Education Act of 1965 (Public Law 89-329, as amended).

(4) The federal Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-579, as amended).

(c) Consider and respond to stakeholder input.

(d) Promote and foster an environment and culture of collaboration and cooperation.

(e) Promote a culture of data-informed decisionmaking by consulting with data experts and intended data users, including members of the public, when developing data use priorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 736, Sec. 5.   (AB 2723)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10864.

(a) The data system shall be governed by a governing board composed of the following 21 members:

(1) The Superintendent of Public Instruction or the Superintendent’s designee.

(2) The Chancellor of the California Community Colleges or the chancellor’s designee.

(3) The Chancellor of the California State University or the chancellor’s designee.

(4) The President of the University of California or the president’s designee.

(5) The President of the Association of Independent California Colleges and Universities or
 the president’s designee.

(6) The Chief of the Bureau for Private Postsecondary Education or the chief’s designee.

(7) The Executive Director of the Student Aid Commission or the executive director’s designee.

(8) The Executive Director of the Commission on Teacher Credentialing or the executive director’s designee.

(9) The Secretary of California Health and Human Services or the secretary’s designee.

(10) The Secretary of Labor and Workforce Development or the secretary’s designee.

(11) Four public members, to be appointed by the Governor, as follows:

(A) Two
 elementary and secondary education practitioners to serve as a representative of elementary and secondary educators, counselors, and administrators.

(B) Two members of the public who meet the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(12) Four members of the public, to be appointed by the Legislature, as follows:

(A) Two members of the public to be appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(B) Two members of the public to be appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate.

(13) One Senator appointed by the President pro Tempore of the Senate, or the Senator’s designee.

(14) One Assembly Member appointed by the
 Speaker of the Assembly or the Assembly Member’s designee.

(15) The Chief Operations Officer of California School Information Services.

(b) A designee serving at the pleasure of a governing board described in paragraphs (1) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be qualified and authorized to make decisions on behalf of the appointed member.

(c) All of the following shall apply to the public member appointments made pursuant to paragraphs (11) and (12) of subdivision (a):

(1) It is the intent of the Legislature that, in appointing members, the appointing authority shall make every effort to ensure the membership of the governing board is reflective of the cultural, racial, geographical, economic, and social diversity of California, taking into
 consideration factors including, but not limited to, diversity in data user experience, diversity in expertise with educational data, diversity in professional experience, and representation from different geographical and socioeconomic backgrounds.

(2) The public members shall represent the public beneficiaries of the data system, including, but not limited to, practitioners, families, students, adult learners and workers, community organizations, research organizations, or advocates.

(3) A public member shall serve a term of no more than three years, and shall not serve more than two consecutive terms or more than six years.

(4) The public members shall have staggered terms.

(5) For the first appointment of public members to the governing board only,
 to create staggered terms, the terms of those members shall be as follows:

(A) The terms of the public members appointed pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) shall be for three years.

(B) The terms of the public members appointed pursuant to subparagraph (B) of paragraph (11) of subdivision (a) shall be for one year.

(C) The terms of the public members appointed pursuant to paragraph (12) of subdivision (a) shall be for two years.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivisions (b) and (c), the governing board may expand membership on the governing board to include new data contributors and ex officio governing board members.

(e) (1) Institutions and
 persons represented on the governing board pursuant to paragraphs (1) to (4), inclusive, and paragraphs (6) to (10), inclusive, of subdivision (a) shall be data providers.

(2) Institutions and persons on the governing board described in paragraphs (5) and (11) to (15), inclusive, of subdivision (a) are not data providers.

(f) The governing board shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 67, Sec. 44.   (AB 1170)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

10865.

(a) The governing board shall provide the governance structure for the data system by developing and revising, from time to time, a self-governance process to ensure that the governing board, among other actions, does all of the following:

(1) Convenes on a regular basis, but no less than quarterly.

(2) Selects a chairperson.

(3) Develops conflict of interest policies in accordance with applicable statutes.

(4) Allows governing board members to receive per diem and reimbursement of travel expenses.

(5) Adopts a vote threshold for decision-making that requires two-thirds of the voting membership to concur in the decision.

(6) Ensures multiagency cooperation.

(7) Develops policies and practices to expand the governing board to include new data providers and ex officio members.

(b) (1) There are hereby established two advisory boards to provide input and feedback to the governing board on topics as follows:

(A) The Data and Tools Advisory Board, with responsibility for examining whether the data system is providing actionable information and identifying ways to improve access to that information.

(B) The Community Engagement Advisory Board, with
 responsibility for examining whether the managing entity is creating strong feedback loops with data users, supporting evidence-based decision-making and analytical capacity, and ensuring equitable access to actionable information.

(2) Members of each of the advisory boards shall be appointed by the governing board, and shall serve three-year terms, with the initial appointment term staggered such that one-third of the positions expire each year.

(c) The governing board may establish and disband additional ad hoc committees, as it sees fit and as is appropriate to further the intent of this chapter.

(d) All advisory boards established by this section shall be subject to the Bagley-Keene Open Meeting Act (Article 9 (commencing with Section 11120) of Chapter 1 of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 8.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10866.

(a) The governing board shall appoint an executive officer to oversee the managing entity. The executive officer shall be exempt from civil service consistent with subdivision (e) of Section 4 of Article VII of the California Constitution, including setting the terms of employment, and annual compensation shall be commensurate with other like positions in state government. The executive officer shall employ such other employees as they deem necessary for the effective conduct of the work of the managing entity.

(b) The governing board shall be responsible for, in consultation with the advisory boards, the strategic direction and implementation of the data system, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Adopting a timeline for phasing in the data system, including a timeline for the development of analytical tools, operational tools, and offering professional development and technical assistance.

(2) Ensuring that the data system is serving its intended purposes by submitting recommendations to the Governor and the Legislature to adjust the data system’s vision, mission, and strategic objectives, particularly recommendations related to improving educational outcomes and reducing opportunity gaps.

(3) Adopting and adjusting as necessary a data dictionary, data standards, and security protocols to ensure interoperability between the data system, the source data, and other state data systems using the same source data.

(4) Expanding the maintained data set, beyond the P20W data set, by doing both of
 the following:

(A) Approving additional data providers.

(B) Requesting additional data points from data providers, in the context of data quality, legal concerns, costs, and preserving the neutrality of the data system. The governing board shall not require a data provider to collect data that the data provider is not legally allowed, under other applicable laws, to collect.

(5) Creating new analytical and operational tools that would help the public interact with the data.

(6) Creating, and revising from time to time, in consultation with the advisory boards, a data request process for use by researchers, policymakers, education systems, schoolsites, and college campuses for information that is all of the following:

(A) In compliance with federal and state laws to protect individual privacy.

(B) Not otherwise available via the public query tools maintained by the managing entity.

(C) Allows for expedited access to summary data that has been properly deidentified.

(D) Allows for data providers to approve data requests in the public interest, as defined pursuant to Section 10861.

(c) (1) The governing board shall be responsible for adopting best practice policies related to privacy and security, including creating policies, in accordance with federal and state law, governing the collection and use of personally identifiable information from data providers, which may include the
 creation of an “opt out” policy for students and families.

(2) This section does not hinder the use of personally identifiable information for educator- and student-facing college guidance and planning tools, defined as operational tools in Section 10861.

(d) The governing board shall provide oversight of the data system and operational direction to the managing entity to ensure the data system is serving its intended purpose. This may include, but is not limited to, all of the following activities:

(1) Adopting an annual strategic plan and reviewing and revising that plan as needed.

(2) Approving budget requests for inclusion in the governing board’s annual budget request.

(3) Ensuring
 continued use of a user-centered design approach by the managing entity.

(4) Reviewing and approving all of the following:

(A) End user professional development, and technical assistance and communications plans, as developed by the managing entity.

(B) An operational tools implementation plan, as developed by the managing entity.

(C) Recommendations for topics to be included in reports to provide a neutral summary of information available in the data system.

(D) Significant content changes to the analytical tools, such as dashboard visualizations and query builder data points.

(5) Conducting data quality audits.

(6) Providing for other audits and evaluations.

(7) Adopting rules and exercising authority to promulgate regulations, including emergency regulations.

(8) Any other activities necessary to further the intent of this chapter.

(9) Providing regular reports to the Legislature and Governor related to the implementation of this chapter. The reports to the Legislature shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(e) For purposes of compliance with the federal Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act of 1974 (Public Law 93-380, as amended), the governing board shall be designated as a state educational authority for purposes of ensuring privacy and effective use of
 the data system consistent with the purposes of this chapter.

(f) The governing board may create any other policies and procedures necessary to further the intent of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 736, Sec. 7.   (AB 2723)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10867.

(a) The managing entity shall implement and manage the data system based on the direction set by the governing board.

(b) The managing entity shall be responsible for all of the following:

(1) Supporting the governing board, advisory boards, and data providers, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Staffing the governing board, advisory boards, and associated meetings and processes.

(B) Supporting the development and updating of the governance manual.

(C) Onboarding
 new data providers, in partnership with the governing board chairperson.

(D) Supporting the development of regulations and policies required to implement this chapter.

(E) Providing analysis and recommendations, as necessary and appropriate, regarding all of the following:

(i) Data points.

(ii) Analytical and operational tools.

(iii) Professional development, technical assistance, and communication plans.

(F) Escalating issues regarding compliance, technical infrastructure, and data system implementation to the governing board, as appropriate and necessary for the furtherance of this chapter.

(2) Managing administrative functions of the data system, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Developing annual work plans, budget requests, and operational budgets.

(B) Overseeing personnel and compensation, except for the appointment and compensation of the executive officer pursuant to Section 10866.

(C) Ensuring regular reporting and external evaluations of the efficacy of the data system in fulfilling its purpose.

(D) Entering into contracts and agreements, as needed to further this chapter.

(3) Managing the technical infrastructure for analytical tools, including, but not limited to, doing all of the
 following:

(A) Creating, procuring, managing, securing, and maintaining the infrastructure necessary to compile, match, store, access, and visualize information from data providers.

(B) Creating data sets tailored to processes approved by the governing board.

(C) Ensuring both of the following:

(i) The availability, reliability, and performance of the technical infrastructure.

(ii) Data privacy and security in accordance with state and federal law.

(4) Implementing public educator- and researcher-facing tools and supporting their use by, including, but not limited to, doing all of the following:

(A) Leading user-centered design and testing processes.

(B) Providing information to the public using, among other tools, dashboards, query builders, and research libraries.

(C) Providing information and resources that do both of the following:

(i) Fosters evidence-based decisionmaking, strengthens analytical capacity to use available data tools, and enables users to understand structural factors that influence outcomes.

(ii) Takes into account the needs of various users.

(D) Engaging users by providing an ongoing channel for public input about the data system.

(E) Providing neutral written summaries of information available through the data system related to the public good and fostering equitable opportunities and outcomes.

(F) Monitoring and taking into account best practices related to longitudinal data systems, including participating in intrastate, interstate, and national data collection and policy efforts.

(5) Scaling, expanding, operating, and maintaining operational tools, including, but not limited to, by doing all of the following:

(A) Conducting an annual student experience audit related to navigating the transition from secondary education to higher education.

(B) Addressing the requirements of paragraph (2) of subdivision (c) of Section 69432.9 relating to submitting pupil grade
 point averages for the purpose of evaluating eligibility for state and federal student financial aid.

(C) Entering into a memorandum of understanding with the CCGI to deliver college planning and transition tools, which may include integrating college admissions and student financial aid applications and other integrations that streamline processes for students.

(D) Entering into a memorandum of understanding with eTranscript California to deliver electronic transcripts and verification of eligibility for social services.

(E) Within five years of the operative date of the act that adds this section, assessing the feasibility of subsuming the operation of operational tools that are currently administered by other agencies, and reporting findings to the governing board, the Legislature, and the Governor. The report to
 the Legislature shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(6) Providing training and technical assistance, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Developing and curating all necessary technical documentation and resources to facilitate data submission.

(B) Ensuring that all data-enabled tools are used by the intended audiences.

(C) Promoting and training related to data literacy for use of the analytical tools.

(7) Supporting data requests, among other activities, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Determining if the content and the purpose of the
 request is sufficiently clear.

(B) Aligning the request with available data and tools and advising the requestor of other similar analyses that have been conducted using the data system.

(C) Advising the requestor on how best to access the information.

(D) Determining and advising the requestor as to whether there are any legal impediments to the request, and supporting the requestor to identify legally appropriate options.

(E) Coordinating the execution of legal agreements with data providers.

(F) Contracting with the Committee for the Protection of Human Subjects for the California Health and Human Services Agency to serve as the institutional review board regarding the use of personally
 identifiable information.

(G) Facilitating the timely resolution of concerns and the provision of data.

(H) Ensuring that the data request process is accessible and transparent. This includes making the criteria for requests, the status for requests, and written responses to any requests that have been denied, publicly available and posted in a prominent location on the data system’s internet website.

(8) Improving data quality by, among other activities, including, but not limited to, doing all of the following:

(A) Coordinating issues related to data points and definitions to ensure the quality and reliability of source data provided by the data providers.

(B) Consulting with the Chief
 Data Officer and data providers to identify standards that would improve the ability to share data across systems.

(C) Regularly reviewing the efficacy and usability of tools, reports, and the user interface.

(D) Working with the advisory boards established pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10865 to identify data points with data quality questions.

(9) Ensuring routine and ongoing compliance with all applicable federal, state, and data provider specific laws and regulations.

(10) Seeking opportunities to increase government efficiency that may include identifying duplications of effort across state agencies and public education systems, and identifying opportunities for clearer or more consistent messaging to students and families related to
 education pathways and transitions.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 8.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10868.

In furtherance of Section 10867, the managing entity may exercise all powers reasonably necessary to carry out and comply with the duties, requirements, and responsibilities of this chapter, including, but not limited to, both of the following:

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, extending, expanding, or otherwise applying an alternative to existing state procurements for goods and services to further the intent of this chapter.

(b) Contracting with national data service providers on behalf of data providers and the entities managing operational tools in order to provide for economies of scale and streamline processes for students.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 8.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10869.

Notwithstanding Section 11010 of the Government Code, and the State Administrative Manual, the governing board and the managing entity may implement a data request fee policy to compensate for excessive use of the data system, to recover costs that would otherwise typically be borne by the requesting data researcher, or both. A data request fee policy implemented pursuant to this section shall be reviewed and approved by the governing board, revised periodically, and made publicly available and posted in a prominent location on the data system’s internet website.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 144, Sec. 8.   (AB 132)   Effective July 27, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

10870.

(a) This section is intended to reduce redundancy, improve efficiency and transparency, and provide students, parents, and counselors with an easy to use, and simple to understand, one-stop automated process to provide all of the following:

(1) Clear, concise, and consistent messaging and tools to increase and monitor student readiness for college admission and attendance.

(2) A single point of entry to submit California college and university applications and applications for student financial aid, including the Free Application for Student Financial Aid and the California Dream Act Application.

(3) Other technological efficiencies that
 shift the burden away from students and families and to the institutions serving them.

(b) Operational tools, as defined by Section 10861, shall be provided by the data system for use by both of the following:

(1) Public schools offering any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, to facilitate college readiness and transition.

(2) Institutions of higher education in the state, to facilitate streamlined application, admissions, assessments, and placements.

(c) The requirements of subdivision (a) shall be phased in by July 27, 2026, based on a timeline to be developed by the governing board pursuant to subdivision (d) of Section 10866.

(d) Notwithstanding Section 49073.1, a local educational agency
 shall not be required to issue a formal contract with a provider of operational tools, as defined in Section 10861.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 736, Sec. 8.   (AB 2723)   Effective September 27, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

10871.

(a) (1) Data providers, as defined in Section 10861, shall contribute to the data system, at least annually, the data points contained in the P20W data set that each data provider agrees to contribute under the terms of its participation agreement with the managing entity.
